Maine, session 132, LD696.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
UNIVERSITY OF MAINE SYSTEM, BOARD OF TRUSTEES OF THE
Educational and General Activities - UMS 0031
Initiative: Provides one-time funds to support the Maine Teacher Residency Program at the
University of Southern Maine.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,000,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,000,000 $0